Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 2. PUBLIC EDUCATION

SUBTITLE C. LOCAL ORGANIZATION AND GOVERNANCE

CHAPTER 18. JOB CORPS DIPLOMA PROGRAMS

Sec. 18.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Job Corps diploma program" or "diploma program" means a public school high school diploma program established and operated under this chapter.

(2) "Job Corps training program" means any corporate entity authorized to do business in the state and currently under contract with the United States Department of Labor to operate a Job Corps training program under the Workforce Investment Act of 1998 (29 U.S.C. Section 2801 et seq.).

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 377 (S.B. 1395), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 18.002. ESTABLISHMENT. (a) A Job Corps training program may establish a high school diploma program to operate public secondary schools at Job Corps facilities throughout the state.

(b) A Job Corps diploma program established under this chapter is separate and distinct from the United States Department of Labor.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 377 (S.B. 1395), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 18.003. AUTHORITY. A Job Corps diploma program may offer a secondary school curriculum, a high school diploma program, and a General Educational Development program.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 377 (S.B. 1395), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 18.004. GOALS. The goals of a Job Corps diploma program are to:

(1) serve at-risk students who have not been successful in a traditional school setting;

(2) increase student success rates in obtaining and maintaining employment; and

(3) decrease future societal costs by offering a high school diploma program to students who would benefit from Job Corps academic and vocational programs.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 377 (S.B. 1395), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 18.005. GOVERNANCE; LIMITATION ON POWERS; DUTIES. (a) A Job Corps diploma program shall be governed as provided by this chapter and policies established by the Job Corps training program operating the diploma program. Unless otherwise provided by this chapter, a provision of this code applicable to a school district does not apply to a Job Corps diploma program.

(b) A Job Corps diploma program may not impose a tax.

(c) A Job Corps diploma program shall:

(1) develop educational programs specifically designed for persons eligible for enrollment in a Job Corps training program established by the United States Department of Labor;

(2) coordinate educational programs and services in the diploma program with programs and services provided by the United States Department of Labor and other federal and state agencies and local political subdivisions and by persons who provide programs and services under contract with the United States Department of Labor;

(3) provide a course of instruction that includes the required curriculum under Subchapter A, Chapter 28;

(4) require that students enrolled in the diploma program satisfy the requirements of Section 39.025 before receiving a diploma under this chapter; and

(5) comply with a requirement imposed under this title or a rule adopted under this title relating to the Public Education Information Management System (PEIMS) to the extent necessary to determine compliance with this chapter, as determined by the commissioner.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 377 (S.B. 1395), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 18.006. ACCOUNTABILITY. (a) The commissioner shall develop and implement a system of accountability consistent with Chapters 39 and 39A, where appropriate, to be used in assigning an annual performance rating to Job Corps diploma programs comparable to the ratings assigned to school districts under Section 39.054. The commissioner may develop and implement a system of distinction designations consistent with Subchapter G, Chapter 39, where appropriate, to be used in assigning distinction designations to Job Corps diploma programs comparable to the distinction designations assigned to campuses under Subchapter G, Chapter 39.

(b) In addition to other factors determined to be appropriate by the commissioner, the accountability system must include consideration of:

(1) student performance on the end-of-course assessment instruments required by Section 39.023(c); and

(2) dropout rates, including dropout rates and diploma program completion rates for the grade levels served by the diploma program.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 377 (S.B. 1395), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1312 (S.B. 1031), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 895 (H.B. 3), Sec. 20, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 21.003(15), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 18.007. ELIGIBILITY FOR CERTAIN PROGRAMS AND SERVICES. (a) Any person enrolled in good standing in a Job Corps diploma program who is not a high school graduate is eligible for programs or services under this chapter.

(b) A person's eligibility for programs and services under this chapter does not exclude the person from being eligible for an educational program or service under any other chapter of this code.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 377 (S.B. 1395), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 18.008. GRANTS AND FEDERAL FUNDS. (a) A Job Corps diploma program may accept a grant from a public or private organization and may spend those funds to supplement programs and provide student services.

(b) A diploma program may accept federal funds and shall use those funds in compliance with applicable federal law, regulations, and guidelines.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 377 (S.B. 1395), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 18.009. COSTS. (a) A Job Corps training program shall pay the cost of operating its diploma program.

(b) The operating costs of a program may not be charged to a school district.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 377 (S.B. 1395), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 18.010. PROGRAM EMPLOYEES. (a) Job Corps diploma program employees are not considered employees of the state.

(b) A diploma program may establish personnel policies as necessary to ensure its effective and efficient operation under this chapter.

(c) A diploma program employee required under Chapter 21 to hold a certificate if employed by a school district must be certified in accordance with that chapter.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 377 (S.B. 1395), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.